Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHILDREN'S MUSEUM GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,525,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,525,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for grants to children's museums for interactive exhibits and outreach programs on arts and cultural heritage. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $175,000 each year is for The Works, Bloomington; new text end new text begin (2) $125,000 each year is for the WonderTrek Children's Museum, Brainerd-Baxter; new text end new text begin (3) $100,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Center, Breckenridge; new text end new text begin (4) $125,000 each year is for the Duluth Children's Museum, Duluth; new text end new text begin (5) $100,000 each year is for the Otter Cove Children's Museum, Fergus Falls; new text end new text begin (6) $100,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Museum, Grand Rapids; new text end new text begin (7) $100,000 each year is for the Wheel and Cog Children's Museum, Hutchinson; new text end new text begin (8) $175,000 each year is for the Children's Museum of Southern Minnesota, Mankato; new text end new text begin (9) $175,000 each year is for the Great River Children's Museum, St. Cloud; new text end new text begin (10) $100,000 each year is for The Village Children's Museum, Willmar; new text end new text begin (11) $100,000 each year is for the Mini Sota Ag Museum, Benson; and new text end new text begin (12) $150,000 each year is for the SPARK Children's Museum, Rochester. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant under this section, an organization must be an exempt entity that meets the definition for children's museums under Internal Revenue Service activity code A52. new text end